Utah statutes.
10-7-14.1.   Declaration of public policy.

Whereas, the purification of drinking water and the treatment of raw sewage are important to public health and welfare and create an unusual need for money with which to create proper facilities for the protection of the people of the state of Utah, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state to grant the privilege to municipalities to raise funds to improve the aforementioned health standards, to encourage the municipalities to provide that no waste shall be discharged into any waters of the state of Utah without first being given proper treatment, to provide for the treatment of water to be used for drinking purposes to protect the health of the citizens and to give municipalities the discretion to determine the priority of development of the facilities directed toward the elimination of health hazards and pollution of public waters. The construction of the facilities herein mentioned shall be given an early priority in those areas where the present welfare of the people is endangered by the lack of such facilities.

